test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_N_INDEP_gwekishin_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     gwekishin: gwekishin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     Px1+gwekishin: nigwekishin
     Px2+gwekishin: gigwekishin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     gwekishin+Neg: gwekishinsii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     gwekishin+1Pl: gwekishinmin
     gwekishin+2Pl: gwekishinm
     gwekishin+Px3: gwekishinw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     gwekishin+Dub: gwekishindig
     gwekishin+Pret: gwekishinban
     gwekishin+PretDub: gwekishingoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     gwekishin+3Obv: gwekishinan
     gwekishin+3Pl: gwekishinag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg: nigwekishinsii
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg: gigwekishinsii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl: nigwekishinmin
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl: nigwekishinm
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3: nigwekishinw
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl: gigwekishinmin
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl: gigwekishinm
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3: gigwekishinw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     Px1+gwekishin+Dub: nigwekishindig
     Px1+gwekishin+Pret: nigwekishinban
     Px1+gwekishin+PretDub: nigwekishingoban
     Px2+gwekishin+Dub: gigwekishindig
     Px2+gwekishin+Pret: gigwekishinban
     Px2+gwekishin+PretDub: gigwekishingoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     Px1+gwekishin+3Obv: nigwekishinan
     Px1+gwekishin+3Pl: nigwekishinag
     Px2+gwekishin+3Obv: gigwekishinan
     Px2+gwekishin+3Pl: gigwekishinag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl: gwekishinsiimin
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl: gwekishinsiim
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3: gwekishinsiiw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     gwekishin+Neg+Dub: gwekishinsiidig
     gwekishin+Neg+Pret: gwekishinsiiban
     gwekishin+Neg+PretDub: gwekishinsiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     gwekishin+Neg+3Obv: gwekishinsiian
     gwekishin+Neg+3Pl: gwekishinsiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     gwekishin+1Pl+Dub: gwekishinmindig
     gwekishin+1Pl+Pret: gwekishinminban
     gwekishin+1Pl+PretDub: gwekishinmingoban
     gwekishin+2Pl+Dub: gwekishinmdig
     gwekishin+2Pl+Pret: gwekishinmban
     gwekishin+2Pl+PretDub: gwekishinmgoban
     gwekishin+Px3+Dub: gwekishinwdig
     gwekishin+Px3+Pret: gwekishinwban
     gwekishin+Px3+PretDub: gwekishinwgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     gwekishin+1Pl+3Obv: gwekishinminan
     gwekishin+1Pl+3Pl: gwekishinminag
     gwekishin+2Pl+3Obv: gwekishinman
     gwekishin+2Pl+3Pl: gwekishinmag
     gwekishin+Px3+3Obv: gwekishinwan
     gwekishin+Px3+3Pl: gwekishinwag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     gwekishin+Dub+3Obv: gwekishindigan
     gwekishin+Dub+3Pl: gwekishindigag
     gwekishin+Pret+3Obv: gwekishinbanan
     gwekishin+Pret+3Pl: gwekishinbanag
     gwekishin+PretDub+3Obv: gwekishingobanan
     gwekishin+PretDub+3Pl: gwekishingobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl: nigwekishinsiimin
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl: nigwekishinsiim
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3: nigwekishinsiiw
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl: gigwekishinsiimin
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl: gigwekishinsiim
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3: gigwekishinsiiw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Dub: nigwekishinsiidig
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Pret: nigwekishinsiiban
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+PretDub: nigwekishinsiigoban
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Dub: gigwekishinsiidig
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Pret: gigwekishinsiiban
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+PretDub: gigwekishinsiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+3Obv: nigwekishinsiian
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+3Pl: nigwekishinsiiag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+3Obv: gigwekishinsiian
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+3Pl: gigwekishinsiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+Dub: nigwekishinmindig
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+Pret: nigwekishinminban
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+PretDub: nigwekishinmingoban
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+Dub: nigwekishinmdig
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+Pret: nigwekishinmban
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+PretDub: nigwekishinmgoban
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+Dub: nigwekishinwdig
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+Pret: nigwekishinwban
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+PretDub: nigwekishinwgoban
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+Dub: gigwekishinmindig
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+Pret: gigwekishinminban
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+PretDub: gigwekishinmingoban
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+Dub: gigwekishinmdig
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+Pret: gigwekishinmban
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+PretDub: gigwekishinmgoban
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+Dub: gigwekishinwdig
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+Pret: gigwekishinwban
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+PretDub: gigwekishinwgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+3Obv: nigwekishinminan
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+3Pl: nigwekishinminag
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+3Obv: nigwekishinman
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+3Pl: nigwekishinmag
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+3Obv: nigwekishinwan
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+3Pl: nigwekishinwag
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+3Obv: gigwekishinminan
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+3Pl: gigwekishinminag
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+3Obv: gigwekishinman
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+3Pl: gigwekishinmag
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+3Obv: gigwekishinwan
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+3Pl: gigwekishinwag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     Px1+gwekishin+Dub+3Obv: nigwekishindigan
     Px1+gwekishin+Dub+3Pl: nigwekishindigag
     Px1+gwekishin+Pret+3Obv: nigwekishinbanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Pret+3Pl: nigwekishinbanag
     Px1+gwekishin+PretDub+3Obv: nigwekishingobanan
     Px1+gwekishin+PretDub+3Pl: nigwekishingobanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Dub+3Obv: gigwekishindigan
     Px2+gwekishin+Dub+3Pl: gigwekishindigag
     Px2+gwekishin+Pret+3Obv: gigwekishinbanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Pret+3Pl: gigwekishinbanag
     Px2+gwekishin+PretDub+3Obv: gigwekishingobanan
     Px2+gwekishin+PretDub+3Pl: gigwekishingobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Dub: gwekishinsiimindig
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret: gwekishinsiiminban
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+PretDub: gwekishinsiimingoban
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Dub: gwekishinsiimdig
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret: gwekishinsiimban
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+PretDub: gwekishinsiimgoban
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Dub: gwekishinsiiwdig
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Pret: gwekishinsiiwban
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+PretDub: gwekishinsiiwgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+3Obv: gwekishinsiiminan
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+3Pl: gwekishinsiiminag
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+3Obv: gwekishinsiiman
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+3Pl: gwekishinsiimag
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+3Obv: gwekishinsiiwan
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+3Pl: gwekishinsiiwag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5
     gwekishin+Neg+Dub+3Obv: gwekishinsiidigan
     gwekishin+Neg+Dub+3Pl: gwekishinsiidigag
     gwekishin+Neg+Pret+3Obv: gwekishinsiibanan
     gwekishin+Neg+Pret+3Pl: gwekishinsiibanag
     gwekishin+Neg+PretDub+3Obv: gwekishinsiigobanan
     gwekishin+Neg+PretDub+3Pl: gwekishinsiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     gwekishin+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: gwekishinmindigan
     gwekishin+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: gwekishinmindigag
     gwekishin+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: gwekishinminbanan
     gwekishin+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: gwekishinminbanag
     gwekishin+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: gwekishinmingobanan
     gwekishin+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: gwekishinmingobanag
     gwekishin+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: gwekishinmdigan
     gwekishin+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: gwekishinmdigag
     gwekishin+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: gwekishinmbanan
     gwekishin+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: gwekishinmbanag
     gwekishin+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: gwekishinmgobanan
     gwekishin+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: gwekishinmgobanag
     gwekishin+Px3+Dub+3Obv: gwekishinwdigan
     gwekishin+Px3+Dub+3Pl: gwekishinwdigag
     gwekishin+Px3+Pret+3Obv: gwekishinwbanan
     gwekishin+Px3+Pret+3Pl: gwekishinwbanag
     gwekishin+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: gwekishinwgobanan
     gwekishin+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: gwekishinwgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Dub: nigwekishinsiimindig
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret: nigwekishinsiiminban
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+PretDub: nigwekishinsiimingoban
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Dub: nigwekishinsiimdig
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret: nigwekishinsiimban
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+PretDub: nigwekishinsiimgoban
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Dub: nigwekishinsiiwdig
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Pret: nigwekishinsiiwban
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+PretDub: nigwekishinsiiwgoban
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Dub: gigwekishinsiimindig
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret: gigwekishinsiiminban
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+PretDub: gigwekishinsiimingoban
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Dub: gigwekishinsiimdig
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret: gigwekishinsiimban
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+PretDub: gigwekishinsiimgoban
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Dub: gigwekishinsiiwdig
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Pret: gigwekishinsiiwban
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+PretDub: gigwekishinsiiwgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+3Obv: nigwekishinsiiminan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+3Pl: nigwekishinsiiminag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+3Obv: nigwekishinsiiman
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+3Pl: nigwekishinsiimag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+3Obv: nigwekishinsiiwan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+3Pl: nigwekishinsiiwag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+3Obv: gigwekishinsiiminan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+3Pl: gigwekishinsiiminag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+3Obv: gigwekishinsiiman
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+3Pl: gigwekishinsiimag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+3Obv: gigwekishinsiiwan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+3Pl: gigwekishinsiiwag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Dub+3Obv: nigwekishinsiidigan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Dub+3Pl: nigwekishinsiidigag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Pret+3Obv: nigwekishinsiibanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Pret+3Pl: nigwekishinsiibanag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+PretDub+3Obv: nigwekishinsiigobanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+PretDub+3Pl: nigwekishinsiigobanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Dub+3Obv: gigwekishinsiidigan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Dub+3Pl: gigwekishinsiidigag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Pret+3Obv: gigwekishinsiibanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Pret+3Pl: gigwekishinsiibanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+PretDub+3Obv: gigwekishinsiigobanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+PretDub+3Pl: gigwekishinsiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: nigwekishinmindigan
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: nigwekishinmindigag
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: nigwekishinminbanan
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: nigwekishinminbanag
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: nigwekishinmingobanan
     Px1+gwekishin+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: nigwekishinmingobanag
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: nigwekishinmdigan
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: nigwekishinmdigag
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: nigwekishinmbanan
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: nigwekishinmbanag
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: nigwekishinmgobanan
     Px1+gwekishin+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: nigwekishinmgobanag
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+Dub+3Obv: nigwekishinwdigan
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+Dub+3Pl: nigwekishinwdigag
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+Pret+3Obv: nigwekishinwbanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+Pret+3Pl: nigwekishinwbanag
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: nigwekishinwgobanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: nigwekishinwgobanag
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: gigwekishinmindigan
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: gigwekishinmindigag
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: gigwekishinminbanan
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: gigwekishinminbanag
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: gigwekishinmingobanan
     Px2+gwekishin+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: gigwekishinmingobanag
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: gigwekishinmdigan
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: gigwekishinmdigag
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: gigwekishinmbanan
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: gigwekishinmbanag
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: gigwekishinmgobanan
